Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 4
HARVEST AND SALE OF PINE STRAW

12-6-200. Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

"Director" means the director of the State Forestry Commission.

"Harvesting" means the various methods or processes of gathering pine straw for preservation, storage, use, or sale.

"Landowner" means the person who owns land on which pine straw is harvested or the person having possession, control, or use of such land who has lawful authority to grant permission to harvest pine straw from the land.

"Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, or any other legal entity.

"Pine straw" means the dead needles of coniferous evergreen trees which have separated from the trees to which they were originally attached.

"Pine straw dealer" means a person who purchases or otherwise obtains pine straw from a seller for the purpose of selling such pine straw at retail or for the purpose of selling such pine straw to another pine straw dealer or for both such purposes. "Pine straw dealer" also includes any person who purchases pine straw directly from a landowner for the purpose of selling such pine straw at retail.

"Seller" means a person who exchanges pine straw for money or for any other valuable consideration.

(Code 1981, §

12-6-200

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 386, § 1.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1989, quotation marks were added to "Pine straw dealer" at the beginning of the last sentence of paragraph (6).

12-6-201. Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds that:

The natural occurrence of pine straw constitutes a significant economic resource for owners of timbered property;

Such owners have been victimized by continuous and repeated trespasses onto their lands by persons engaged in harvesting pine straw and have been deprived of the economic benefit of such resources; and

The repeated trespasses onto private property by certain persons engaged in the harvesting and baling of pine straw constitute an organized and methodical deprivation of the rights of others, necessitating the enactment of this article.

(Code 1981, §

12-6-201

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 386, § 1.)

12-6-202. Certificate of harvest.

As a condition of selling pine straw to a pine straw dealer within the State of Georgia, the seller shall obtain and present to the pine straw dealer a certificate of harvest. A certificate of harvest shall be a written or printed document signed by the landowner where the pine straw was harvested granting permission for the harvest of the pine straw. A certificate of harvest shall be valid for one year. In addition to the permission of the landowner to harvest pine straw, a certificate of harvest shall include the following information:

The name, address, and telephone number of the landowner who granted permission to harvest the load of pine straw;

The name, address, and telephone number of the person who was authorized to harvest the load of pine straw; and

The date and location of the harvest, which shall include the state and county where harvested.

A pine straw dealer who purchases pine straw directly from a landowner shall obtain a landowner's certificate of harvest. A landowner's certificate of harvest shall show the name, address, and telephone number of the landowner and the date and location of the harvest, including the state and county where harvested. A landowner's certificate of harvest shall be signed by the landowner.

(Code 1981, §

12-6-202

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 386, § 1.)

12-6-203. Prohibited acts.

It shall be unlawful for any person to sell or offer to sell pine straw to a pine straw dealer or seller within the State of Georgia without presenting to the pine straw dealer or seller a certificate of harvest or landowner's certificate of harvest.

It shall be unlawful for any pine straw dealer or seller within the State of Georgia to purchase pine straw without first obtaining a certificate of harvest or landowner's certificate of harvest from the seller.

(Code 1981, §

12-6-203

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 386, § 1.)

12-6-204. Stop sale, stop use, or removal orders to owners or custodians of pine straw.

The director may issue and enforce written or printed stop sale, stop use, or removal orders to the owners or custodians of any pine straw ordering them to hold the same at a designated place, when the director finds that such pine straw is being offered or exposed for sale in violation of this article, until the law has been complied with and such pine straw has been released, in writing, by the director, or until such violations have been otherwise legally disposed of by written authority. The director shall release pine straw products when the requirements of this article have been complied with.

(Code 1981, §

12-6-204

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 386, § 1.)

12-6-205. Seizure of pine straw obtained or offered for sale in violation of article.

Any pine straw obtained or offered for sale in violation of this article shall be subject to seizure on the complaint of the director to the superior court of the county in which the pine straw is found. If the court finds the pine straw to be in violation of this article, and orders its condemnation, the pine straw shall be disposed of in any manner consistent with its quantity, the interests of the parties, and the laws of this state, provided that in no instance shall the pine straw be ordered by the court to be disposed of without first giving the person claiming the pine straw an opportunity to apply to the court for release of the pine straw in such manner as to bring it into compliance with this article.

(Code 1981, §

12-6-205

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 386, § 1.)

12-6-206. Harvesting or handling pine straw for home or personal use.

This article shall not be construed so as to affect any farmer or other person harvesting or handling pine straw for home or personal use.

(Code 1981, §

12-6-206

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 386, § 1.)

12-6-207. Penalty.

Any person violating any provisions of this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(Code 1981, §

12-6-207

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 386, § 1.)